nouns.ch.lexd
PATTERNS

NounAbs [<n>:]
NounGenComp (Case[Noun_gen] | Case[Noun_comp])                          # Genitive + Comparative
NounDatLocInstr[dat_a] Epent (Case[Noun_dat] | Case[Noun_loc])          # Dative + Locative, with epenthesis
NounDatLocInstr[-dat_a] (Case[Noun_dat] | Case[Noun_loc])               # Dative + Locative, without epenthesis
NounDatLocInstr (EpentIns)? Case[Noun_ins]                              # Instrumentalis
(NounErgCompLoc[erg_a] Case[erg_a] | NounErgCompLoc[erg_o] Case[erg_o]) # Ergative
NounErgCompLoc (Case[Noun_comp] | Case[Noun_loc])                       # Comparative + Locative

# Allative and its derivatives
(NounAll[all_e] Case[all_e] | NounAll[all_a] Case[all_a] | NounAll[all_ga] Case[all_ga]) (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?


LEXICON Epent # vowel epenthesis
:а

LEXICON EpentIns # separate vowel epenthesis for Instrumentalis
:{obl}
